Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-630
Applicability of act.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a transaction.

(2) The act does not apply to a transaction to the extent it is governed by:

(a) A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts; or

(b) The Uniform Commercial Code other than article 2 and article 2A.

(3) The act applies to an electronic record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of the act under subsection (2) of this section to the extent it is governed by a law other than those specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A transaction subject to the act is also subject to other applicable substantive law.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2103;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 392;

Laws 2005, LB 570, § 4.